Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Alaska Longevity Bonus.

Revisor’s notes. —

Chapter 99, SLA 1985 established, subject to a contingency requiring legislative action, an annuity program funded by permanent fund dividends.
The contingency was never satisfied and the sections establishing the proposed annuity program were repealed by § 17, ch. 20, SLA 2002.

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 205, SLA 1972 (FCCS HCS CSSB 211), which enacted this chapter, see 1972 House Journal, p. 751.

Collateral references. —

70A Am. Jur. 2d, Social Security and Medicare, § 1 et seq.

81 C. J. S., Social Security and Public Welfare, §§ 187-192.

Sec. 47.45.010.
Persons who may qualify for longevity bonus.

A person who is 65 years of age or over who resides in the state for at least one year immediately preceding application for a longevity bonus under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

may apply to the commissioner of administration no later than December 31, 1996, for qualification to receive a monthly bonus of

$250, if the person’s application was submitted before January 1, 1994;

$200, if the person’s application was submitted on or after January 1, 1994, but before January 1, 1995;

$150, if the person’s application was submitted on or after January 1, 1995, but before January 1, 1996; or

$100, if the person’s application was submitted on or after January 1, 1996, but before January 1, 1997.

When the commissioner of health and social services determines that an applicant qualifies under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

the commissioner shall immediately begin payment of the bonus.

A person who otherwise qualifies to receive a bonus provided for in AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

may continue to do so only as long as that person continues to be a resident of the state.

[Repealed, § 62 ch 21 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 147 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 1984; am §§ 5, 6 ch 107 SLA 1989; am §§ 61, 62 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 64 SLA 1993; am E.O. No. 108 § 61 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in connection with the 1984 amendment to this section, see § 1, ch. 38, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for legislative findings in connection with the 1989 amendment to (a) of this section, see § 1(b), ch. 107, SLA 1989 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “commissioner of health and social services” for “commissioner of administration” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8, ch. 107, SLA 1989 provides that notwithstanding the amendment to (a) of this section by § 5 of ch. 107, “ if an individual received a longevity bonus payment for any month during 1989, the individual’s eligibility to receive bonus payments during 1990 shall be determined under the law as it existed before that amendment.”

Section 6(a), ch. 64, SLA 1993 provides that “[u]nder AS

01.10.030

, if any provision of AS

47.45.010(a)(1)

-(4), amended by § 2 of this Act, AS

47.45.045

, added by § 3 of this Act, or AS

47.45.070(a)(5)

and (6), added by § 4 of this Act, or the application of a provision of this Act to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this Act and the application to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected.”

For the right to reapply under § 2, ch. 55, SLA 2000, see the editor’s notes following AS

47.45.070

.

Sec. 47.45.020.
Continuous eligibility procedures.

After qualification, monthly applications for bonuses may be made in person to any office of the Department of Health and Social Services. Mailed monthly applications shall also be considered by the department. In-person or mailed applications shall be made on forms provided by the department and shall conform to the conditions as provided by regulation. The commissioner of health and social services may make exceptions for those residents who are isolated in rural areas and cannot mail a monthly application; however, they shall mail an application at least once every six months.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 108 § 62 (2003))

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “Department of Health and Social Services” for “Department of Administration” and “commissioner of health and social services” for “commissioner of administration.”

Sec. 47.45.030.
Absence from the state.

After qualification, a recipient shall notify the commissioner of health and social services when the recipient expects to be absent from the state if the absence is for a continuous period that exceeds 60 days. After that notification, the recipient may no longer receive bonuses from the Department of Health and Social Services after the last regularly approved monthly application. Upon returning to the state, the recipient may again make application for a bonus. Failure to notify the commissioner of an expected absence may be grounds for disqualification.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 78 SLA 2002.]

A recipient who has been absent from the state for a continuous period that exceeds three years is permanently disqualified from receiving bonuses.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 38 SLA 1984; am § 19 ch 99 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2, 4 ch 78 SLA 2002; am E.O. No. 108 § 63 (2003))

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “Department of Health and Social Services” for “Department of Administration” and “commissioner of health and social services” for “commissioner of administration” in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 78, SLA 2002, provides that the 2002 amendments to subsection (a), the repeal of subsection (b), and the addition of subsection (c) apply “only to absences from the state that begin after September 18, 2002”, and also provides that the section as it read before September 18, 2002, applies “to a period of absence that began before [that date].”

Sec. 47.45.035.
Unpaid sabbaticals. [Repealed, § 4 ch 78 SLA 2002.]

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 78, SLA 2002, provides that the 2002 repeal of this section applies “only to absences from the state that begin after September 18, 2002”, and also provides that AS

47.45.035

as it read before September 18, 2002, applies “to a period of absence that began before [that date].”

Sec. 47.45.040.
Disqualification.

Disqualification under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

shall rest solely with the commissioner of health and social services and shall be outlined in the regulations adopted under AS

47.45.100

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 108 § 64 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “commissioner of health and social services” for “commissioner of administration.”

Sec. 47.45.045.
Reapplication after disqualification. [Repealed, § 4 ch 78 SLA 2002.]

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 78, SLA 2002, provides that the 2002 repeal of this section applies “only to absences from the state that begin after September 18, 2002”, and also provides that AS

47.45.035

as it read before September 18, 2002, applies “to a period of absence that began before [that date].”

Sec. 47.45.050.
Department hearing.

The Department of Health and Social Services may arrange with the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) to hold a hearing upon the request of an applicant or recipient who has been disqualified. Before this hearing, the department shall, by certified mail, notify an applicant or recipient in plain and comprehensive language the exact reason for the disqualification. Form letters using only referral to state statutes or department regulations, or otherwise vague in detail, are not considered compliance by the department with this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 108 § 65 (2003); am § 90 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “Department of Health and Social Services” for “Department of Administration” at the beginning of the section.

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “arrange with the office of administrative hearing (AS

44.64.010

) to hold a hearing” for “hold a departmental hearing” in the first sentence.

Sec. 47.45.060.
Legal remedy.

Legal remedy from disqualification may be sought by an applicant or recipient in any court of competent jurisdiction in the state.
The burden of proof shall rest solely upon the applicant or recipient and any costs related to a disqualification verdict determined against the applicant or recipient may be recoverable by the attorney general from that person, or from any agency representing that person supported in whole, or in part, with state appropriations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.45.070.
Unqualified persons.

An unqualified person is one who

does not meet the age or residence requirements as provided for under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

;

meets the age and residence requirements of AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

but either is confined in a state or federal mental health institution or facility and is certified by the state as unable to manage personal affairs, or resides in a nursing home as that term is defined in AS

08.70.180

; however, if that person, at the time of commitment or commencement of residence, provided the principal support of a spouse, the commissioner of health and social services may determine to pay the confined person’s bonus to the person’s spouse until the spouse is qualified for a bonus;

is otherwise qualified but confined in a penal or correctional institution or facility; upon completion of sentence or upon the conferral of a pardon, parole, or probation, the person may make application; confinement outside the state shall be considered as residence in the state if a person was convicted and sentenced from a court in Alaska; revocation of parole or probation shall be cause for immediate disqualification until release from confinement is again effected;

is permanently disqualified under AS

47.45.030(c)

;

did not apply, under AS

47.45.010(a)

, before January 1, 1997, for qualification to receive a longevity bonus;

was found qualified to receive a longevity bonus and was subsequently permanently disqualified under former AS

47.45.030(b)

or former AS

47.45.045

.

Notwithstanding (a)(2) of this section, a person who meets the age and residence requirements of AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

qualifies for the bonus during any period of residence in a nursing home that does not exceed 90 consecutive days if the bonus is exempt from the determination of income eligibility under Supplemental Security Income in 42 U.S.C. 1382a (Sec. 1612(b)(2)(B), Social Security Act), as amended.

Notwithstanding (a)(2) of this section, a person who resides in a nursing home who meets the age and residence requirements of AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

qualifies for the bonus if the costs of care of the person at the nursing home are paid for entirely from private sources, veterans’ benefits, or a combination of private sources and veterans’ benefits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am § 20 ch 99 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 64 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 78 SLA 2002; am E.O. No. 108 § 66 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “commissioner of health and social services” for “commissioner of administration” in paragraph (a)(2).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 6(a), ch. 64, SLA 1993 provides that “[u]nder AS

01.10.030

, if any provision of AS

47.45.010(a)(1)

-(4), amended by § 2 of this Act, AS

47.45.045

, added by § 3 of this Act, or AS

47.45.070(a)(5)

and (6), added by § 4 of this Act, or the application of a provision of this Act to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this Act and the application to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected.”

Section 2, ch. 55, SLA 2000 provides as follows: “

APPLICATIONS AND REAPPLICATIONS FOR LONGEVITY BONUS PAYMENTS.

(a) Notwithstanding AS

47.45.045

, a person who qualified to receive a monthly longevity bonus payment under AS

47.45.010

before January 1, 1997, but was later disqualified under AS

47.45.070(a)(2)

may reapply for qualification for bonus payments. If the Department of Administration determines that the person is eligible for bonus payments under AS

47.45.070(c)

, as amended in sec. 1 of this Act, and is otherwise eligible, the amount of the person’s monthly bonus shall be the amount the person was receiving before reapplying under this subsection.

“(b) Notwithstanding AS

47.45.010

, a person who originally applied before January 1, 1997, and did not qualify to receive a monthly longevity bonus under AS

47.45.070(a)(2)

but who otherwise would have qualified may file a new application. If the Department of Administration determines that the person is eligible for bonus payments under AS

47.45.070(c)

, as amended in sec. 1 of this Act, and is otherwise eligible, the amount of the person’s monthly bonus shall be the amount the person would have received had the person qualified under the original application.”

Section 5, ch. 78, SLA 2002, provides that the 2002 amendments to subsection (a) apply “only to absences from the state that begin after September 18, 2002”, and also provides that the subsection as it read before September 18, 2002, applies “to a period of absence that began before [that date].” See § 5, ch. 78, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 47.45.080.
Accrual of bonuses.

A recipient may not for any reason, receive an accrual of bonuses in excess of two monthly payments. Interest may not be paid on accrued bonuses. Upon the death of a recipient the commissioner of health and social services shall pay to the beneficiary of the recipient any accrued bonuses not to exceed two monthly payments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 108 § 67 (2003))

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “commissioner of health and social services” for “commissioner of administration.”

Sec. 47.45.090.
Alaska longevity bonus fund. [Repealed, § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 47.45.100.
Regulations.

The commissioner of health and social services shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 12 ch 42 SLA 1997; am E.O. No. 108 § 68 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “commissioner of health and social services” for “commissioner of administration.”

Sec. 47.45.110.
Treasurer of system.

The commissioner of revenue is the treasurer of the system and has powers and duties for this purpose.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am § 7 ch 42 SLA 1997)

Sec. 47.45.120.
Exemption from state and local taxation and from debt collection.

Bonuses received under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

are exempt from all state and political subdivision taxes except sales and use taxes. A bonus received under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

is not exempt from a federal tax requirement.

Bonuses received under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

are exempt from levy to enforce the collection of a debt as provided in AS 09.38 (Alaska Exemptions Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Sec. 47.45.122.
Eligibility for public assistance.

An individual whose public assistance is denied or reduced solely because of the receipt of a bonus under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

by the individual or by a member of the individual’s household is eligible for assistance under the general relief assistance program in AS

47.25.120

—

47.25.300

. Notwithstanding the limit in AS

47.25.130

, the individual is entitled to receive the same amount as the individual would have received under other public assistance programs had the individual not received a longevity bonus.

In this section “other public assistance” means

Supplemental Security Income under 42 U.S.C. 1381 — 1385;

Medicaid under 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p; and

Adult Public Assistance under AS

47.25.430

—

47.25.615

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 99 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Sec. 47.45.130.
Death or cessation of residency.

The commissioner of health and social services shall establish procedures to stop a bonus when a recipient under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

no longer qualifies. When a recipient dies or discontinues residency in the state the recipient’s qualification for a bonus shall stop at the time of the recipient’s last approved monthly application.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 108 § 69 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “commissioner of health and social services” for “commissioner of administration.”

Sec. 47.45.140.
Penalty for false statements or records.

A person who wilfully or knowingly makes a false statement, or falsifies or permits to be falsified any record required by AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both, forfeits all rights under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

, and shall make adequate restitution for any bonuses illegally received.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Sec. 47.45.150.
Definitions.

In AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

,

“bonus” means a monthly Alaska longevity bonus payment made to a person or the person’s beneficiary who qualifies under AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

;

“resident” or “resident of the state” means an individual who is physically present in the state with the intent to remain in the state indefinitely and to make a home in the state; a person demonstrates the requisite intent by maintaining a principal place of abode in the state for one year and by providing other proof of intent the commissioner may require by regulation, including proof that the person is not claiming residency outside the state or obtaining benefits under a claim of residency outside the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Administrative Code. —

For longevity bonus program, see 2 AAC 40.

Sec. 47.45.160.
Administrative Procedure Act not applicable.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) does not apply to AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 205 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, “AS

47.45.010

—

47.45.160

” was substituted for “this chapter” to reflect the 2003 addition of AS

47.45.200

—

47.45.290

.

Sec. 47.45.170.
Purpose. [Repealed, § 6 ch 38 SLA 1984.]